Maryland, session 2026, SB0963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “Department” means the Maryland Department of Health.
(b) (1) The Department shall procure a replacement system for the State’s
Medicaid Management Information System to promote payment accuracy, system security
and performance, responsiveness, and to modernize the current system’s outdated
technological infrastructure, subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services as required.
(2) The replacement system shall support, at a minimum, the
functionalities of the existing system, including provider enrollment, medical, dental and
pharmacy claims processing, beneficiary inquiries, data reporting, and audit functions in
accordance with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and other applicable
federal requirements, including 42 C.F.R. Part 433, Subpart C.
(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department shall integrate the
replacement system with the Medicaid Enterprise System.
(2) On or before January 1, 2028, the Department shall:
(i) transition all Department applications from the Annapolis Data
Center to the replacement system; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0963*

SENATE BILL 963
(ii) decommission the legacy Medicaid Management Information
System on completion of the transition.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.